District of Columbia statutes.
8-1403.01

Stops and inspection.

To determine compliance with this chapter and its implementing regulations, a police officer may stop the driver of a motor vehicle and enter upon the premises of a motor carrier that is regulated pursuant to this chapter and inspect any of the following:

(1)

All equipment, parts, and accessories, including carrier maintenance, certification, and safety records;

(2)

All driver records, including driver’s license, permits, hours of service records, certificate of physical examination, and training records;

(3)

All manifests, including bills of lading or other shipping documents; and

(4)

All cargo and cargo areas, including the removal of cargo seals when necessary to conduct a safety inspection.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-190, § 4(a)
as added Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-173, § 3(b), 39 DCR 5834
This section is referenced in § 8-1403.02.
1981 Ed., § 6-3303.1.